Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF649.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 710A.1, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: b. âHuman traffickingâ also means knowingly purchasing or attempting to purchase services involving commercial sexual activity from a victim or another person engaged in human trafficking , or from a law enforcement officer or agent posing as a person engaged in human trafficking . Sec. 2. Section 710A.1, subsections 10 and 13, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 10. âServicesâ means an ongoing relationship between a person and the actor in which the person performs performing activities under the supervision of or for the benefit of the an actor, including commercial sexual activity and sexually explicit performances. 13. âVictimâ means a person subjected to human trafficking. any of the following: a. A person subjected to human trafficking. b. A person who is identified as being subjected to or targeted for human trafficking. c. A law enforcement officer or agent posing as a person subjected to or a target for human trafficking. House File 649, p. 2 Sec. 3. Section 725.1, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: b. A person who purchases or offers to purchase services as a partner in a sex act from a person who is under the age of eighteen , or who is reasonably believed to be under the age of eighteen including a law enforcement officer or agent posing as a minor under the age of eighteen, commits a class âDâ felony. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 649, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor